Mississippi, session 2026, SB3398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Joseph Jones of Jefferson Davis County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on June 28, 2002, as a result of his convictions in Simpson County for two (2) counts of armed robbery and one (1) count of grand larceny. As a related matter, he was also convicted in Simpson County of kidnapping.  He was sentenced to serve four (4) terms in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections: (a)  A ten-year term for the first charge of armed robbery with a five-year term of post-release supervision; (b)  A ten-year term for the second charge of armed robbery; (c)  A ten-year term for the charge of kidnapping; and (d)  A three-year term for the charge of grand larceny. The Mississippi Department of Corrections represents that the terms were to be served concurrently.  He was discharged from the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections on May 1, 2012, due to the expiration of his sentence.  Upon representation from the Mississippi Department of Corrections, he was discharged from probation on March 4, 2012.  He completed all terms and conditions of his sentence. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.